Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202058-840
Authority; financing obligations completed; convey title to eligible institution.

When
the principal of and interest on bonds of the authority issued to finance
the cost of a particular project or projects for an
eligible institution, including
any refunding bonds issued to refund and refinance such bonds, have been fully
paid and retired or when adequate provision has been made to fully pay and
retire the same, and all other conditions of the resolution and any trust indenture authorizing the same
have been satisfied and the lien created by such resolution or trust indenture has been released in accordance
with the provisions thereof, the authority shall promptly do such things and
execute such deeds, conveyances, and other instruments, if any, as are necessary
and required to convey title to such project or projects to such eligible institution.

Laws 1981, LB 321, § 37;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2937;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 37;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1737;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 40.